Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.100

Affidavit of judgment creditor—Filing required before issuance of writ—Contents.

(1) Before a writ of execution may issue on any real property, the judgment creditor must file with the court an affidavit as described in subsection (4) of this section and must mail a copy of the affidavit to the judgment debtor at the debtor's last known address.

(2) If the affidavit attests that the premises are occupied or otherwise claimed as a homestead by the judgment debtor, the execution for the enforcement of a judgment obtained in a case not within the classes enumerated in RCW 6.13.080 must comply with RCW 6.13.100 through 6.13.170.

(3) The term "due diligence," as used in subsection (4) of this section, includes but is not limited to the creditor or the creditor's representative personally visiting the premises, contacting the occupants and inquiring about their relationship to the judgment debtor, contacting immediate neighbors of the premises, and searching the records of the auditor of the county in which the property is located to determine if a declaration of homestead or nonabandonment has been recorded by the judgment debtor. An examination of the debtor in supplemental proceedings on the points to be covered in the affidavit constitutes "due diligence."

(4) The affidavit required by this section shall include:

(a) A statement that the judgment creditor has exercised due diligence to ascertain whether the judgment debtor has sufficient nonexempt personal property to satisfy the judgment with interest and believes that there is not sufficient nonexempt personal property belonging to the judgment debtor to so satisfy the judgment. A list of personal property located shall be attached with an indication of any items that the judgment creditor believes to be exempt.

(b) A statement that the judgment creditor has exercised due diligence to ascertain whether the property is occupied or otherwise claimed by the judgment debtor as a homestead as defined in chapter 6.13 RCW.

(c) A statement based on belief whether the judgment debtor is currently occupying the property as the judgment debtor's principal residence and whether there is a declaration of homestead or nonabandonment of record. If the affidavit alleges that the property is not occupied or claimed as a homestead, the creditor must list the facts relied upon to reach that conclusion.

(d) If the judgment debtor is not occupying the property and there is no declaration of nonabandonment of record, a statement based on belief whether the judgment debtor has been absent for a period of at least six months, with facts relied upon to reach that conclusion, and, if known, the judgment debtor's current address.

[ 1988 c 231 s 8; 1987 c 442 s 410; 1981 c 329 s 4. Formerly RCW 6.04.035.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.

Severability—1981 c 329: See note following RCW 6.21.020.